en: E640(ii), Sodiumglycinate
xx: E640(ii)
ar: E640(ii), غليسينات الصوديوم
az: E640(ii), Natrium qlisinat
bg: E640(ii), Натриев глицинат
ca: E640(ii), Glicinat de sodi
cs: E640(ii), Glycinát sodný
da: E640(ii), Natriumglycinat
de: E640(ii), Natriumglycinat
el: E640(ii), Γλυκινικό νάτριο
eo: E640(ii), Natria glicinato
es: E640(ii), Glicinato de sodio
et: E640(ii), Naatriumglütsinaat
fa: E640(ii), گلیسینات سدیم
fi: E640(ii), Natriumglysinaatti, Natriumglysinaattia
fr: E640(ii), Sodiumglycinate, Glycinate de sodium, glycinate sodique, sel de sodium de glycine
hu: E640(ii), nátrium-glicinát
it: E640(ii), Glicinato di sodio
ja: E640(ii), グリシン酸ナトリウム
ko: E640(ii), 글리신산 나트륨
lt: E640(ii), Natrio glicinatas
lv: E640(ii), Nātrija glicināts
mt: E640(ii), Gliċinat tas-sodju
nl: E640(ii), Natriumglycinaat
pl: E640(ii), Glicynian sodu
pt: E640(ii), Glicinato de sódio
ro: E640(ii), Glicinat de sodiu
ru: E640(ii), Глицинат натрия
sk: E640(ii), Glycinát sodný
sl: E640(ii), Natrijev glicinat
sv: E640(ii), Natriumglycinat
th: E640(ii), โซเดียมไกลซิเนต
tr: E640(ii), Sodyum glisinat
uk: E640(ii), Гліцинат натрію
vi: E640(ii), Natri glycine
zh: E640(ii), 甘氨酸钠

en: E641, Leucine, L-Leucine
xx: E641
ar: E641, ليوسين
be: E641, Лейцын
bg: E641, Левцин
bn: E641, লিউসিন
bs: E641, Leucin
ca: E641, leucina
cs: E641, leucin
da: E641, Leucin, L-leucin
de: E641, L-Leucin
el: E641, Λευκίνη
eo: E641, Leŭcino
es: E641, L-leucina, Leucina
et: E641, Leutsiin
eu: E641, Leuzina
fa: E641, لوسین
fi: E641, l-leusiini, leusiini
fr: E641, l-leucine, leucine
gl: E641, Leucina
he: E641, לאוצין
hr: E641, Leucin
hu: E641, L-leucin
id: E641, Leusina
it: E641, L-leucina, leucina
ja: E641, ロイシン
ko: E641, 류신
ku: E641, Leusîn
lb: E641, Leucin
lt: E641, Leucinas
lv: E641, leicīns
mk: E641, Леуцин
nb: E641, Leucin
nl: E641, leucine
nn: E641, Leusin
oc: E641, Leucina
pl: E641, L-leucyna
pt: E641, Leucina
ro: E641, Leucină
ru: E641, лейцин
sh: E641, Leucin
sk: E641, Leucín
sl: E641, Levcin
sr: E641, леуцин
sv: E641, Leucin, L-leucin
ta: E641, லியூசின்
th: E641, ลิวซีน
tr: E641, Lösin
uk: E641, Лейцин
uz: E641, Leytsin
vi: E641, Leucine
zh: E641, 亮氨酸

en: E642
xx: E642
ar: E642, هيدروكلوريد ليسين
az: E642, Lizin hidroxlorid
bg: E642, Лизин хидрохлорид
ca: E642, Lisina hidroclorur
cs: E642, Hydrochlorid lysinu
da: E642, Lysinhydrochlorid
de: E642, Lysinhydrochlorid
el: E642, Υδροχλωρική λυσίνη
eo: E642, Lizina hidroclorido
es: E642, Lisina hidrocloruro
et: E642, Lüsiinvesinikkloriid
fa: E642, لیزین هیدروکلراید
fi: E642, Lysiinihydrokloridi, Lysiinihydrokloridia
fr: E642, Hydrochlorure de lysine
hu: E642, Lizin-hidroklorid
id: E642, Lisin hidroklorida
it: E642, Lisina cloridrato
ja: E642, 塩酸リシン
ko: E642, 리신 염산염
lt: E642, Lizino hidrochloridas
lv: E642, Lizīna hidrohlorīds
mk: E642, Лизин хидрохлорид
mt: E642, Idroklorid tal-lisina
nl: E642, Lysinehydrochloride
pl: E642, Chlorowodorek lizyny
pt: E642, Cloridrato de lisina
ro: E642, Clorhidrat de lizină
ru: E642, Лизина гидрохлорид
sk: E642, Hydrochlorid lyzínu
sl: E642, Lizin hidroklorid
sq: E642, Lizin hidroklorid
sr: E642, Лизин хидрохлорид
sv: E642, Lysinhydroklorid
th: E642, ไลซีนไฮโดรคลอไรด์
tr: E642, Lizin hidroklorür
uk: E642, Лізину гідрохлорид
vi: E642, Lysine hydrochloride
zh: E642, 赖氨酸盐酸盐

en: E650, Zinc acetate, zinc salt
xx: E650
af: E650, Sinkasetaat, sink sout
ar: E650, أسيتات الزنك، ملح الزنك
az: E650, Sink asetat, sink duzu
bg: E650, Цинков ацетат, цинкова сол
ca: E650, Acetat de zinc
cs: E650, Octan zinečnatý, Zinečnatá sůl octové kyseliny
da: E650, Zinkacetat
de: E650, Zinkacetat
el: E650, Οξικός ψευδάργυρος, άλας ψευδαργύρου
eo: E650, Zinka acetato, zinka salo
es: E650, Acetato de cinc
et: E650, Tsinkatsetaat
fi: E650, Sinkkiasetaatti, Etikkahapon sinkkisuola, Sinkkiasetaattia, Etikkahapon sinkkisuolaa
fr: E650, Acétate de zinc, sel de zinc
he: E650, אבץ אצטט, מלח אבץ
hi: E650, जस्ता एसीटेट, जस्ता नमक
hr: E650, Cinkov acetat, cinkova sol
hu: E650, Cink-acetát, cinksó
id: E650, Seng asetat, garam seng
is: E650, Sinkasetat, sink salt
it: E650, Acetato di zinco, sale di zinco
ja: E650, 酢酸亜鉛, 亜鉛塩
ko: E650, 아세트산 아연, 아연 염
lt: E650, Cinko acetatas, cinko druska
lv: E650, Cinka acetāts, cinka sāls
mk: E650, Цинков ацетат, цинкова сол
ms: E650, Zink asetat, garam zink
mt: E650, Aċetat taż-żingu, melħ taż-żingu
nl: E650, Zinkacetaat, zinkzout
no: E650, Sinkacetat, sinksalt
pl: E650, Octan cynku, Sól cynkowa kwasu octowego
pt: E650, Acetato de zinco, Sal de zinco do ácido acético
ro: E650, Acetat de zinc, sare de zinc
ru: E650, Ацетат цинка, цинковая соль
sh: E650, Cink acetat, cinkova sol
sk: E650, Octan zinočnatý, zinková soľ
sl: E650, Cinkov acetat, cinkova sol
sq: E650, Acetat zinku, kripë zinku
sr: E650, Цинк ацетат, цинкова со
sv: E650, Zinkacetat
th: E650, ซิงค์อะซิเตต, เกลือสังกะสี
tr: E650, Çinko asetat, çinko tuzu
uk: E650, Цинк ацетат, цинкова сіль
vi: E650, Kẽm axetat, muối kẽm
zh: E650, 醋酸锌，锌盐

en: E710, Spiramycin
xx: E710
ar: E710, سبيراميسين
az: E710, Spiramisin
bg: E710, Спирамицин
ca: E710, Espiramicina
cs: E710, Spiramycin
da: E710, Spiramycin
de: E710, Spiramycin, Rovamycine, Suanatem
el: E710, Σπιραμυκίνη
eo: E710, Spiramicino
es: E710, Espiramicina
et: E710, Spiramycin
fa: E710, اسپیرامایسین
fi: E710, Spiramysiini, Spiramysiiniä
fr: E710, Spiramycines Antibiotique, Spiramycine, 24916-50-5, C43H74N2O14
he: E710, ספירמיצין
hi: E710, स्पाइरामाइसिन
hr: E710, Spiramicin
hu: E710, spiramicin, spiramycin
id: E710, Spiramycin
it: E710, Spiramicina
ja: E710, スピラマイシン
ko: E710, 스피라마이신
lt: E710, Spiramicinas
lv: E710, Spiramicīns
mk: E710, Спирамицин
ms: E710, Spiramycin
mt: E710, Spiramiċina
nl: E710, Spiramycines, Spiramycine
no: E710, Spiramycin
pl: E710, Spiramycyna
pt: E710, Espiramicina
ro: E710, Spiramicină
ru: E710, Спирамицин
sk: E710, Spiramycín
sl: E710, Spiramicin
sq: E710, Spiramicin
sr: E710, Спирамицин
sv: E710, spiramycin
th: E710, สไปราไมซิน
tr: E710, Spiramycin
uk: E710, Спіраміцин
vi: E710, Spiramycin
zh: E710, 螺旋霉素

en: E713, Tylosin
xx: E713
ar: E713, تايلوزين
az: E713, Tilozin
bg: E713, Тилозин
ca: E713, Tilosina
cs: E713, Tylosin
da: E713, Tylosin
de: E713, Tylosin
el: E713, Τυλοσίνη
eo: E713, Tilosin
es: E713, Tilosina
et: E713, Tülosiin
fa: E713, تیلوزین
fi: E713, Tylosiini, Tylosiiniä
fr: E713, Tylosine Antibiotique, Tylosine
hu: E713, Tylosin
it: E713, Tilosina
ja: E713, チロシン
ko: E713, 타이로신
lt: E713, Tilozinas
lv: E713, Tilozīns
mk: E713, Тилозин
mt: E713, Tilosin
nl: E713, Tylosine
pl: E713, Tylozyna
pt: E713, Tilosina
ro: E713, Tilosin
ru: E713, Тилозин
sk: E713, Tylosín
sl: E713, Tilozin
sq: E713, Tilosin
sr: E713, Тилозин
sv: E713, Tylosin
th: E713, ไทโลซิน
tr: E713, Tilozin
uk: E713, Тилозин
vi: E713, Tylosin
zh: E713, 泰乐菌素

en: E900, Dimethylpolysiloxane and Methylphenylpolysiloxane
xx: E900
ar: E900, ثنائي ميثيل بولي سيلوكسان وميثيل فينيل بولي سيلوكسان
az: E900, Dimetilpolisiloksan və Metilfenilpolisiloksan
bg: E900, Диметилполисилоксан и Метилфенилполисилоксан
ca: E900, Dimetilpolisiloxà i Metilfenilpolisiloxà
cs: E900, Dimethylpolysiloxan a Methylfenylpolysiloxan
da: E900, Dimethylpolysiloxan og Methylphenylpolysiloxan
de: E900, Dimethylpolysiloxan und Methylphenylpolysiloxan
el: E900, Διμεθυλοπολυσιλοξάνη και Μεθυλοφαινυλοπολυσιλοξάνη
es: E900, Dimetilpolisiloxano y Metilfenilpolisiloxano
et: E900, Dimetüülpolüsiloksaan ja Metüülfenüülpolüsiloksaan
fi: E900, Dimetyylipolysiloksaani ja Metyylifenyylipolysiloksaani
fr: E900, Diméthylpolysiloxane et Méthylphénylpolysiloxane
hu: E900, Dimetilpolisziloxán és Metil-fenil-polisziloxán
it: E900, Dimetilpolisilossano e Metilfenilpolisilossano
ja: E900, ジメチルポリシロキサンとメチルフェニルポリシロキサン
ko: E900, 디메틸폴리실록산 및 메틸페닐폴리실록산
lt: E900, Dimetilpolisiloksanas ir Metilfenilpolisiloksanas
lv: E900, Dimetilpolisiloksāns un Metilfenilpolisiloksāns
mt: E900, Dimetilpolisilossan u Metilfenilpolisilossan
nl: E900, Dimethylpolysiloxaan en Methylphenylpolysiloxaan
pl: E900, Dimetylopolisiloksan i Metylofenylopolisiloksan
pt: E900, Dimetilpolisiloxano e Metilfenilpolisiloxano
ro: E900, Dimetilpolisiloxan și Metilfenilpolisiloxan
ru: E900, Диметилполисилоксан и Метилфенилполисилоксан
sk: E900, Dimetylpolysiloxán a Metylfenylpolysiloxan
sl: E900, Dimetilpolisiloksan in Metilfenilpolisiloksan
sv: E900, Dimetylpolysiloxan och Metylfenylpolysiloxan
zh: E900, 二甲基聚硅氧烷和甲基苯基聚硅氧烷

en: E900a, Dimethyl polysiloxane, Polydimethyl siloxane, Silicone fluid, Silicone oil, Polydimethylsiloxane, dimethicone, dimethylpolysiloxane
xx: E900a
bg: E900a, Диметилполисилоксан, Полидиметил силоксан, течен силикон, силиконово масло
ca: E900a, Dimetilpolisiloxà, dimetilpolisiloxa
cs: E900a, Dimethylpolysiloxan, silikonový olej, Amodimethicone
da: E900a, Dimethylpolysiloxan, Polydimethylsiloxan, siliconeolie
de: E900a, Dimethylpolysiloxan, Polydimethylsiloxan, Silicone, Baysilon, Dimeticon
el: E900a, Διμεθυλοπολυσιλοξανιο, Πολυδιμεθυλοσιλοξάνιο, έλαιο σιλικόνης
es: E900a, Dimetilpolisiloxano, Polidimetilsiloxano, silicona fluida, aceite de silicona
et: E900a, Dimetüülpolüsiloksaanadditive
fi: E900a, Dimetyylipolysiloksaani, Polydimetyylisiloksaani, Dimetyylipolysiloksaania, Polydimetyylisiloksaania
fr: E900a, Polydiméthylsiloxane, Diméthicone, Diméthylpolysiloxane, fluide de silicones, huile de silicones, Amodimétichone, Diméticone, Dimétichone, Amodiméthicone, PMDS, Diméthyl-polysiloxane
hu: E900a, Dimetil-polisziloxán, Szilikonolaj, Dimetil-szilikon
it: E900a, Dimetilpolisilossano, Polidimetilsilossano, fluido di silicone, olio di silicone, PDMS
lt: E900a, Dimetilpolisiloksanas, Polidimetilsiloksanas, silikono skystis, silikoninė alyva
lv: E900a, Dimetilpolisiloksāns, Polidimetilsiloksāns, silikonu šķidrums, silikonu eļļa
mt: E900a, Polisilossan dimetiliku, Silossan polidimetiliku, Fluwidu tas-silikon, Żejt tas-silikon
nl: E900a, Dimethylpolysiloxaan, Polydimethylsiloxaan, siliconenvloeistof, siliconenolie, Dimethicone
pl: E900a, Dimetylopolisiloksan, płyn silikonowy, olej silikonowy, PDMS
pt: E900a, Dimetilpolissiloxano, Polidimetilsiloxano, fluido de silicone, óleo de silicone, Dimetil polissiloxano
ro: E900a, Dimetilpolisiloxan, Polidimetilsiloxan, Fluid de silicon, Ulei de silicon
sk: E900a, Dimetylpolysiloxán, Polydimetyl siloxán, silikónová tekutina, silikónový olej
sl: E900a, Dimetilpolisiloksan, polidimetil siloksan, tekoči silikon, silikonsko olje
sv: E900a, Dimetylpolysiloxan, Polydimetylsiloxan, silikonvätska, silikonolja

en: E900b, Methylphenylpolysiloxane
xx: E900b
ar: E900b, ميثيل فينيل بولي سيلوكسان
az: E900b, Metilfenilpolisiloksan
bg: E900b, Метилфенилполисилоксан
ca: E900b, Metilfenilpolisiloxan
cs: E900b, Methylfenylpolysiloxan
da: E900b, Methylphenylpolysiloxan
de: E900b, Methylphenylpolysiloxan
el: E900b, Μεθυλφαινυλπολυσιλοξάνη
es: E900b, Metilfenilpolisiloxano
et: E900b, Metüülfenüülpolüsiloksaan
fi: E900b, Metyylifenyyli-polysiloksaani, Metyylifenyylipolysiloksaania
fr: E900b, Méthylphénylpolysiloxane
hu: E900b, Metil-fenil-polisziloxán
it: E900b, Metilfenilpolisilossano
ja: E900b, メチルフェニルポリシロキサン
ko: E900b, 메틸페닐폴리실록산
lt: E900b, Metilfenilpolisiloksanas
lv: E900b, Metilfenilpolisiloksāns
mt: E900b, Metilfenilpolisilossan
nl: E900b, Methylfenylpolysiloxaan
pl: E900b, Metylfenylopolisiloksan
pt: E900b, Metilfenilpolissiloxano
ro: E900b, Metil-fenil-poli-siloxan, Metilfenilpolisiloxan, Metilfenilpolisiloxan
ru: E900b, Метилфенилполисилоксан
sk: E900b, Metyl-fenyl-polysiloxán
sl: E900b, Metilfenilpolisiloksan
sv: E900b, Metylfenylpolysiloxan
zh: E900b, 甲基苯基聚硅氧烷

en: E901, white and yellow beeswax, beeswax, white beeswax, yellow beeswax, white wax, bees wax
xx: E901
af: E901, Byewas
ar: E901, شمع العسل
az: E901, Arı mumu
be: E901, Пчаліны воск
bg: E901, Пчелен восък бял и жълт, Пчелен восък, Пчелен восък бял, Пчелен восък жълт, Бял восък
bn: E901, মোম
bs: E901, Pčelinji vosak
ca: E901, Cera d'abelles, Cera d'abella
cs: E901, Včelí vosk bílý a žlutý, Včelí vosk, Včelí vosk bílý, Včelí vosk žlutý, Bílý vosk, E 901
da: E901, Bivoks hvidt og gult, Bivoks, Bivoks hvidt, Bivoks gult, Hvidt voks, E-901
de: E901, Bienenwachs weiß und gelb, Bienenwachs, Bienenwachs weiß, Bienenwachs gelb, weißes Wachs, Bienenwachs, E 901, Myricin, Cera Flava, Bienenwachs weiss und gelb
el: E901, Κηρος μελισσων, λευκος και κιτρινος, Λευκός κηρός
eo: E901, Abelvakso
es: E901, Cera de abeja blanca y amarilla, Cera de abeja, Cera de abeja blanca, Cera de abeja amarilla, Cera blanca, Cera estampada, cera amarilla de abejas
et: E901, Kollane ja valge meevaha, Valge vaha, Mesilasvaha, Vaha
eu: E901, Erle-argizari
fa: E901, موم زنبور عسل
fi: E901, Mehiläisvaha valkoinen ja keltainen, Mehiläisvaha, Mehiläisvaha valkoinen, Mehiläisvaha keltainen, Valkoinen mehiläisvaha, Mehiläisvahaa valkoista ja keltaista, Mehiläisvahaa, Mehiläisvahaa valkoista, Mehiläisvahaa keltaista, Valkoista mehiläisvahaa, Mehiläisvaha\, valkoinen ja keltainen
fr: E901, Cire d'abeille, Cire d'abeille alimentaire, Cire d'abeille blanchâtre, Cire d'abeille jaunâtre, Cire blanche, cire jaune, Cire d'abeilles, Cire d'abeille blanche et jaune
fy: E901, Bijewaaks
ga: E901, céir bheach
gl: E901, Cera estampada
he: E901, דונג דבורים
hi: E901, मधुमोम
hr: E901, pčelinji vosak
hu: E901, Fehér és sárga méhviasz, Méhviasz, Fehér méhviasz, Sárga méhviasz, Fehér viasz
hy: E901, Մեղրամոմ
id: E901, Lilin lebah
it: E901, Cera d'api binaca e gialla, Cera d'api, Cera d'api binaca, Cera d'api gialla, Cera vergine
ja: E901, 蜜蝋
jv: E901, Malam
ka: E901, ფუტკრის ცვილი
ko: E901, 밀랍
ku: E901, şima
lt: E901, Bičių vaškas baltas ir geltonas, Bičių vaškas, Bičių vaškas baltas, Bičių vaškas geltonas, Baltasis vaškas
lv: E901, Baltais un dzeltenais bišu vasks, Bišu vasks, Baltais bišu vasks, Dzeltenais bišu vasks, Baltais vasks
ml: E901, തേനീച്ചയുടെ മെഴുക്
ms: E901, Lilin lebah
mt: E901, Xama' tan-naħal, bajda u safra, Xama' bajda
nb: E901, Bivoks
ne: E901, मौरीको मैन
nl: E901, Bijenwas wit en geel, Bijenwas, Bijenwas wit, Bijenwas geel, Witte was, Ceratiet
nn: E901, Bivoks
oc: E901, Cera d'abelha
pl: E901, Wosk pszczeli biały i żółty, Wosk pszczeli, Wosk pszczeli biały, Wosk pszczeli żółty, Wosk biały
pt: E901, Cera de abelhas (branca e amarela), Cera branca, Cera
ro: E901, Ceară de albine albă și galbenă, Ceară de albine, Ceară de albine albă, Ceară de albine galbenă, Ceară albă
ru: E901, пчелиный воск
rw: E901, Igishashara
sh: E901, Pčelinji vosak
si: E901, මී ඉටි
sk: E901, Biely a žltý včelí vosk, včelí vosk, biely včelí vosk, žltý včelí vosk, biely vosk
sl: E901, Čebelji vosek beli in rumeni, Čebelji vosek, Čebelji vosek beli, Čebelji vosek rumeni, beli vosek
sq: E901, Dylli
sr: E901, пчелињи восак
sv: E901, Bivax vitt och gult, Bivax, Bivax vitt, Bivax gult, Vitt vax, E 901, Keromanti, Vaxkaka
tg: E901, Муми занбӯри асал
th: E901, ขี้ผึ้ง
tl: E901, Mantika de papel
tr: E901, Balmumu
uk: E901, Бджолиний віск
uz: E901, Asalari mumi
vi: E901, Sáp ong
zh: E901, 蜂蜡

en: E902, Candelilla wax
xx: E902
bg: E902, Канделилов восък
ca: E902, Cera de candelilla
cs: E902, Kandelilový vosk
da: E902, Candelillavoks
de: E902, Candelillawachs, Candellinawachs, Candelilla-Wachs
el: E902, Κανδελιλλικος κηρος
es: E902, Cera candelilla
et: E902, Kandelillavaha
fi: E902, Kandelillavaha, Kandelillavahaa
fr: E902, Cire de Candelilla, Cire de Candellila, Candellila
hu: E902, Kandelillaviasz, A kandelillaviasz, a kandelilla
it: E902, Cera candelilla
lt: E902, Kandelila vaškas
lv: E902, Kandelilvasks
mt: E902, Xama' tal-kandelilla
nl: E902, Candelillawas
pl: E902, Wosk candelilla, Kandelila
pt: E902, Cera de candelilha
ro: E902, Ceară de candelilla
sk: E902, Vosk kandelila
sl: E902, Kandelilni vosek
sv: E902, Kandelillavax

en: E903, Carnauba wax, carnauba wax coating agents
xx: E903
ar: شمع الخارنوبا
bg: E903, Карнаубов восък
ca: E903, Cera de carnauba, agent de recobriment de cera carnauba
cs: E903, Karnaubský vosk
da: E903, Carnaubavoks, Carnauba voks
de: E903, Carnaubawachs, Cera Carnauba, Karnaubawachs, Carnaubawachsüberzugsmittel, Überzugsmittel Carnaubawachs
el: E903, Καρναουβικος κηρος
eo: palma vakso
es: E903, Cera de carnauba, Cera carnauba, agente de recubrimiento de cera de carnauba
et: E903, Karnaubavaha
fa: E903, موم نخل
fi: E903, Karnaubavaha, Karnaubavahaa
fr: E903, Cire de carnauba
he: E903, ווקס קרנובה
hi: E903, कार्नायूबावैक्स
hr: E903, karnuba vosak, karnauba vosak
hu: E903, Karnaubaviasz
it: E903, Cera carnauba, Cera di carnauba, Carnauba, agenti di rivestimento cera di carnauba
lt: E903, Karnaubo vaškas
lv: E903, Karnaubvasks
mt: E903, Xama' tal-karnawba
nb: E903, Karnaubavoks
nl: E903, Carnaubawas, Cera Carnauba
nn: E903, carnauba voks
pl: E903, Wosk carnauba, Carnauba
pt: E903, Cera de carnaúba
ro: E903, Ceară de carnauba
ru: E903, Карнаубский воск
sk: E903, Karnaubský vosk
sl: E903, Karnauba vosek
sr: E903, карнауба восак
sv: E903, Karnaubavax
th: E903, ไขคาร์นอบา
uk: E903, Карнаубський віск

en: E904, Shellac, Bleached shellac
xx: E904
ar: E904, شيلاك
bg: E904, Шеллак, Избелен шеллак
bn: E904, লাক্ষা
ca: E904, Goma laca
cs: E904, Šelak, Bělený šelak
da: E904, Shellak, Bleget shellak, Shellac
de: E904, Schellack, gebleichter Schellack
el: E904, Σελακ, Λευκασμένη γομολάκα
eo: E904, Ŝelako
es: E904, Goma laca, Goma laca blanqueada
et: E904, Shellac, Šellak
fa: E904, شلاک
fi: E904, Sellakka, Valkaistu sellakka, Sellakkaa, Valkaistua sellakkaa
fo: E904, Skellakk
fr: E904, Gomme-laque, gomme laque, Shellac, Gomme laque blanchie, gomme schellac
ga: E904, Seileaic
he: E904, שלאק
hi: E904, चपड़ा
hr: E904, Šelak
hu: E904, Sellak, Fehérített sellak
hy: E904, Շելլակ
it: E904, Gommalacca, Gommalacca bianca
ja: E904, シェラック
lt: E904, Šelakas, Išbalintas šelakas
lv: E904, Šellaka, Balinātā šellaka
ml: E904, കോലരക്ക്
ms: E904, Syelek
mt: E904, Xellak, Xellak ibbliċjat
my: E904, ချိပ်ဆေး
nb: E904, Skjellakk
nl: E904, Schellak, Gebleekte schellak
pl: E904, Szelak, Szelak bielony
pt: E904, Goma-laca, Goma-laca branqueada
ro: E904, Șelac, Șelac albit, şelac
ru: E904, Шеллак
sh: E904, Šelak
sk: E904, Šelak, Bielený šelak
sl: E904, Šelak, beljeni šelak
sv: E904, Shellack, Blekt shellack, Schellack
te: E904, లక్క
th: E904, เชลแล็ก
tl: E904, shellac
tr: E904, Şellak
uk: E904, Шелак
vi: E904, Sơn cánh kiến
zh: E904, 蟲膠

en: E905, Synthetic wax, Hydrocarbon wax, Fischer-Tropsch wax
xx: E905
bg: E905, синтетичен восък, въглеводороден восък, восък на Фишер-Тропш
da: E905, syntetisk voks, fischer-tropsch-voks
de: E905, Syntetisches Wachs, Kohlenwasserstoffwachs, Fischer-Tropsch-Paraffin
el: E905, συνθετικός κηρός, κηρός υδρογονανθράκων , κηρός Fischer-Tropsch
es: E905, cera sintética, cera de hidrocarburo, cera Fischer-Tropsch
fi: E905, sünteetiline vaha, süsivesinikvaha, Fischer-Tropschi vaha, hiilivetyvaha, hiilivetyvahaa
fr: E905, Cire synthétique, Cire d'hydrocarbure, Cire Fischer-Tropsch
hu: E905, Szintetikus viasz, Szénhidrogénviasz, Fischer-Tropsch-viasz
it: E905, cera sintetica, cera di idrocarburi, cera Fischer-Tropsch
lt: E905, sintetinis vaškas, angliavandenilių vaškas, Fischer-Tropsch vaškas
mt: E905, Xama' sintetika, Xama' tal-idrokarburi, Xama' Fischer-Tropsch
nl: E905, synthetische was, koolwaterstofwas, fischer-tropschwas
pl: E905, wosk syntetyczny, wosk węglowodorowy, wosk Fischera-Tropscha
pt: E905, cera sintética, cera de hidrocarbonetos, cera Fischer-Tropsch
ro: E905, Ceară sintetică, Ceară de hidrocarburi, Ceară Fischer-Tropsch
sk: E905, sintetični vosek, vosek Fischer-Tropsch

en: E905a, mineral oil
xx: E905a
ar: E905a, زيت معدني
ca: E905a, oli mineral
cs: E905a, Minerální olej
de: E905a, Mineralöl
es: E905a, Aceite mineral
et: E905a, Mineraalõli
fa: E905a, روغن معدنی
fi: E905a, Mineraaliöljy, Mineraaliöljyä
fr: E905a, Huile minérale de qualité alimentaire, Huile minérale
he: E905a, שמן תעשייתי
hi: E905a, खनिज तेल
hu: E905a, Ásványi olaj
hy: E905a, Հանքային յուղեր
id: E905a, Minyak mineral
it: E905a, E905a, Olio minerale
ja: E905a, 鉱油
ko: E905a, 광물유
ms: E905a, Minyak galian
nl: E905a, Minerale olie
pl: E905a, Oleje mineralne
pt: E905a, Óleo mineral
ro: E905a, Ulei mineral calitate alimentară
ru: E905a, нефтяные масла
si: E905a, ඛනිජ තෙල්
sl: E905a, Mineralno olje
sr: E905a, Минерално уље
sv: E905a, mineralolja
ta: E905a, கனிம எண்ணெய்
uk: E905a, Мінеральні масла
vi: E905a, dầu khoáng
zh: E905a, 矿物油

en: E905b, petroleum jelly, petrolatum, white petrolatum, soft paraffin, multi-hydrocarbon
xx: E905b
af: E905b, Petroleumjellie
ar: E905b, هلام النفط, ڤازلين
az: E905b, Vazelin
be: E905b, Петралатум, Вазелін
bg: E905b, Вазелин
ca: E905b, Vaselina
cs: E905b, Vazelína
da: E905b, Vaseline
de: E905b, Vaseline
el: E905b, Βαζελίνη
eo: E905b, Vazelino
es: E905b, vaselina, petrolato, Vasenol
et: E905b, Petrolaatum
eu: E905b, Baselina
fa: E905b, ژله پترولیوم, وازلین
fi: E905b, Vaseliini, Vaseliinia
fr: E905b, Petrolatum, Vaseline, gelée de pétrole
gl: E905b, Vaselina
he: E905b, וזלין
hi: E905b, पेट्रोलियम जेली
hr: E905b, Vazelin
hu: E905b, Petrolátum, puha paraffin, vazelin
hy: E905b, Վազելին
id: E905b, Petroleum_jelly, Vaselin
io: E905b, Vazelino
it: E905b, Petrolato
ja: E905b, ワセリン
kk: E905b, Вазелин
ko: E905b, 석유 젤리, 바셀린
ky: E905b, Вазелин
ms: Vaseline
nb: E905b, hvit myk parafin, Vaselin
nl: E905b, petroleum jelly, Vaseline
nn: E905b, kvit mjuk parafin
pl: E905b, Wazelina
ps: E905b, واسلين
pt: E905b, vaselina, gelatina de petróleo
ro: E905b, Vaselină
ru: E905b, вазелин
sk: E905b, Mastiaci tuk
sr: E905b, Вазелин
sv: E905b, Vaselin
ta: E905b, தைலக்களிம்பு
tg: E905b, Вазелин
tl: E905b, Vaseline
tr: E905b, Vazelin
uk: E905b, Вазелін
uz: E905b, Vazelin
vi: VE905b, aseline
wa: E905b, Petroleum jelly
yi: E905b, וואזעלין
zh: E905b, 礦脂, 凡士林

en: E905c, Petroleum wax
xx: E905c
af: E905c, Petroleumwas
ar: E905c, شمع البترول
az: E905c, Neft mum
bg: E905c, Петролен восък
ca: E905c, Cera de petroli
cs: E905c, Ropný vosk
da: E905c, Petroleumsvoks
de: E905c, Petroleumwachs
el: E905c, Κερί πετρελαίου
eo: E905c, Nafta vakso
es: E905c, Cera de petróleo
et: E905c, Naftavaha
eu: E905c, Petrolio-argizaria
fa: E905c, موم نفتی
fi: E905c, Maaöljyvaha
fr: E905c, Cire de pétrole
gl: E905c, Cera de petróleo
he: E905c, שעוות נפט
hi: E905c, पेट्रोलियम मोम
hr: E905c, Petrolni vosak
hu: E905c, Paraffinviasz
hy: E905c, Նավթային մոմ
id: E905c, Lilin petroleum
is: E905c, Jarðolíu vax
it: E905c, Cera di petrolio
ja: E905c, 石油ワックス
ka: E905c, ნავთობის ცვილი
ko: E905c, 석유 왁스
lt: E905c, Naftos vaškas
lv: E905c, Naftas vasks
mk: E905c, Петролејски восок
ms: E905c, Lilin petroleum
mt: E905c, Xama' tal-petroleum
nl: E905c, Petroleumwas
no: E905c, Parafinvoks
pl: E905c, Wosk naftowy
pt: E905c, Cera de petróleo
ro: E905c, Ceară de petrol
ru: E905c, Нефтяной воск
sk: E905c, Ropný vosk
sl: E905c, Parafinski vosek
sq: E905c, Dylli i naftës
sr: E905c, Петролејски восак
sv: E905c, Petroleumvax
th: E905c, ขี้ผึ้งปิโตรเลียม
tr: E905c, Petrol mumu
uk: E905c, Нафтовий віск
vi: E905c, Sáp dầu hỏa
zh: E905c, 石油蜡

en: E905c(i), Microcrystalline wax
xx: E905c(i)
bg: E905c(i), Микрокристален восък
ca: E905c(i), Cera microcristallina
cs: E905c(i), Mikrokrystalický vosk
da: E905c(i), Mikrokrystallinsk voks, Mikrovoks
de: E905c(i), Mikrokristallines wachs, Mikrowachs, Microcristallina
el: E905c(i), Μικροκρυσταλλικος κηρος
es: E905c(i), Cera microcristalina
et: E905c(i), Mikrokristalne vaha
fi: E905c(i), Mikrokiteinen vaha, Mikrokiteistä vahaa
fr: E905c(i), Cire microcristalline
hu: E905c(i), Mikrokristályos viasz
it: E905c(i), Cera microcristallina
lt: E905c(i), Mikrokristalinis vaškas
lv: E905c(i), Mikrokristāliskais vasks
mt: E905c(i), Xama' mikrokristallina
nl: E905c(i), Microkristallijne was
pl: E905c(i), Wosk mikrokrystaliczny
pt: E905c(i), Cera microcristalina
ro: E905c(i), Ceară microcristalină
sk: E905c(i), Mikrokryštalický vosk
sl: E905c(i), Mikrokristalni vosek
sv: E905c(i), Mikrokristallint vax

en: E905c(ii), Paraffin wax
xx: E905c(ii)
ar: E905c(ii), برافين
az: E905c(ii), Parafin
ba: E905c(ii), Парафин
be: E905c(ii), Парафін
bg: E905c(ii), Парафин
ca: E905c(ii), Parafina
cs: E905c(ii), Parafín
cy: E905c(ii), Paraffîn
da: E905c(ii), Paraffin
de: E905c(ii), Paraffin
eo: E905c(ii), parafino
es: E905c(ii), parafina
et: E905c(ii), Parafiin, Toorparafiin
eu: E905c(ii), Parafina
fa: E905c(ii), پارافین
fi: E905c(ii), Parafiini, Parafiinia
fr: E905c(ii), Cire de paraffine, Paraffine, Paraffines, Paraffine synthétique
ga: E905c(ii), Céir pharaifín
gd: E905c(ii), Parabhan
gl: E905c(ii), Parafina
he: E905c(ii), פרפין
hi: E905c(ii), पैराफिन
hr: E905c(ii), Parafin
hu: E905c(ii), Paraffin
hy: E905c(ii), Պարաֆին
id: E905c(ii), Parafin
is: E905c(ii), Paraffínvax
it: E905c(ii), Paraffina
ja: E905c(ii), パラフィン
kk: E905c(ii), Парафин
ko: E905c(ii), 파라핀
la: E905c(ii), Paraffinum
lt: E905c(ii), Parafinas
lv: E905c(ii), parafīns
ml: E905c(ii), പാരഫിൻ മെഴുക്
mt: E905c(ii), E905c(ii) food additive
nl: E905c(ii), Parafine was
nn: E905c(ii), parafinvoks
pl: E905c(ii), Parafina
pt: E905c(ii), parafina
ro: E905c(ii), E905c(ii), Parafină
ru: E905c(ii), парафин
sd: E905c(ii), paraffin wax
sl: E905c(ii), Parafin
sv: E905c(ii), Paraffin
ta: E905c(ii), பாராஃபின் மெழுகு
th: E905c(ii), พาราฟิน
tr: E905c(ii), Parafin
tt: E905c(ii), Парафин
uk: E905c(ii), Парафін
ur: E905c(ii), نالفین
vi: E905c(ii), Parafin
yi: E905c(ii), פאראפין
zh: E905c(ii), 石蜡

en: E905d, Mineral oil high viscosity
xx: E905d
bg: E905d, Високовискозитно минерално масло
cs: E905d, Minerální olej vysoké viskozity
da: E905d, Mineralolie med høj viskositet
de: E905d, Mineralöl hohe Viskosität
el: E905d, Υψηλής ιξώδους ορυκτό έλαιο
es: E905d, Aceite mineral de alta viscosidad
et: E905d, Kõrge viskoossusega mineraalõli
fi: E905d, Nestemäinen parafiini, Nestemäistä parafiinia, Korkeaviskositeettinen mineraaliöljy
fr: E905d, Paraffine liquide, Petrolatum liquide, Huile min. blanche, Huile minérale à haute viscosité
hu: E905d, Magas viszkozitású ásványi olaj
it: E905d, Olio minerale ad alta viscosità
lt: E905d, Aukštos klampumo mineralinė alyva
lv: E905d, Augsta viskozitāte minerālais eļļa
mt: E905d, Xibka ta' viskożità għolja tal-ħalib
nl: E905d, Minerale olie met hoge viscositeit
pl: E905d, Olej mineralny o wysokiej lepkości
pt: E905d, Óleo mineral de alta viscosidade
ro: E905d, Ulei mineral cu vâscozitate mare
sk: E905d, Minerálny olej s vysokou viskozitou
sl: E905d, Mineralno olje visoke viskoznosti
sv: E905d, Mineralolja med hög viskositet